Hawaii statutes.
§323D-22 Subarea health planning councils,
functions, quorum and number of members necessary to take valid action.
(a) Each subarea health planning council shall review, seek public input, and
make recommendations relating to health planning for the geographical subarea
it serves. In addition, the subarea health planning councils shall:

(1) Identify and recommend to the state agency and
the council the data needs and special concerns of the respective subareas with
respect to the preparation of the state plan.

(2) Provide specific recommendations to the state
agency and the council regarding the highest priorities for health services and
resources development.

(3) Review the state health services and facilities
plan as it relates to the respective subareas and make recommendations to the
state agency and the council.

(4) Advise the state agency in the administration of
the certificate of need program for their respective subareas.

(5) Advise the state agency on the cost of
reimbursable expenses incurred in the performance of their functions for
inclusion in the state agency budget.

(6) Advise the state agency in the performance of its
specific functions.

(7) Perform other such functions as agreed upon by
the state agency and the respective subarea councils.

(8) Each subarea health planning council shall
recommend for gubernatorial appointment at least one person from its membership
to be on the statewide council.

(b) The number of members necessary to
constitute a quorum to do business shall consist of a majority of all the
members who have accepted nomination to the council, and have been confirmed
and qualified as members of the council. When a quorum is in attendance, the
concurrence of a majority of the members in attendance shall make any action of
the council valid. [L 1977, c 178, pt of §2; am L 1978, c 129, §4; am L 1980, c
75, §8; am L 1982, c 245, §5; am L 1987, c 270, §8; am L 1997, c 336, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next